Washington statutes.
RCW 18.170.110

Required notice of certain occurrences.

(1) A private security company shall notify the director within thirty days after the death or termination of employment of any employee who is a licensed private security guard or armed private security guard by returning the license to the department with the word "terminated" written across the face of the license, the date of termination, and the signature of the principal or the principal's designee of the private security guard company.

(2) A private security company shall notify the department within seventy-two hours and the chief law enforcement officer of the county, city, or town in which the private security guard or armed private security guard was last employed immediately upon receipt of information affecting his or her continuing eligibility to hold a license under the provisions of this chapter.

(3) A private security guard company shall notify the local law enforcement agency whenever an employee who is an armed private security guard discharges his or her firearm while on duty other than on a supervised firearm range. The notification shall be made within ten business days of the date the firearm is discharged.

[ 2000 c 171 s 39; 1995 c 277 s 8; 1991 c 334 s 11.]